Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3129
Code of conduct.

A psychologist and anyone under his or her supervision shall conduct his or her professional activities in conformity with the code of conduct.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 88;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.26;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1063.